Maryland, session 2026, SB0505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Aviation Administration.
5–107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AERONAUTICAL SERVICES” INCLUDES:
(I) FUELING, HANGARING, TYING DOWN, OR PARKING AN
AIRCRAFT;
(II) AIRCRAFT RENTAL;
(III) AIRCRAFT MAINTENANCE; AND
(IV) FLIGHT INSTRUCTION.
(3) “AVIATION SERVICE COMPANY” MEANS A SINGLE–SERVICE FIXED
BASE OPERATOR (FBO) THAT OFFERS SPECIALIZED AERONAUTICAL SERVICES.
(4) “DETAINED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS A PASSENGER WHO IS
TRAVELING INVOLUNTARILY OR WHILE BEING HELD IN ANY KIND OF RESTRAINT.
(5) “FIXED BASE OPERATOR” OR “FBO” MEANS A COMMERCIAL
BUSINESS THAT AN AIRPORT HAS GRANTED THE RIGHT TO:
(I) OPERATE AT AN AIRPORT FACILITY; AND
(II) PROVIDE AERONAUTICAL SERVICES.

SENATE BILL 505 3
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN AIRCRAFT TRAVELING WITH A
DETAINED INDIVIDUAL.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEVELOP A FORM TO BE USED FOR ANY
PASSENGER ON AN AIRCRAFT WHO IS A DETAINED INDIVIDUAL THAT:
(1) COLLECTS INFORMATION ON:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICAL HISTORY, INCLUDING:
1. ALLERGIES;
2. CURRENT MEDICAL CONDITIONS; AND
3. MEDICATIONS; AND
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL’S LEGAL HISTORY, INCLUDING:
1. CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE INDIVIDUAL’S
ATTORNEY; AND
2. ANY PENDING LEGAL PROCEEDINGS;
(2) IDENTIFIES WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS A MINOR AND, IF SO,
PROVIDES GUARDIANSHIP INFORMATION IF THE GUARDIAN IS NOT ON BOARD THE
AIRCRAFT;
(3) STATES THAT THE FORMS WILL BE REVIEWED BY AN FBO OR AN
AVIATION SERVICE COMPANY AND, IN THE CASE OF AN EMERGENCY, SHARED WITH
EMERGENCY RESPONDERS;
(4) INFORMS THE INDIVIDUAL THAT COMPLETION OF THE FORM IS
VOLUNTARY; AND
(5) FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO CHOOSES NOT TO COMPLETE THE FORM,
CONTAINS A SPACE FOR THE INDIVIDUAL TO AFFIRMATIVELY INDICATE THAT THEY
HAVE SEEN THE FORM AND ARE CHOOSING NOT TO COMPLETE THE FORM.
(D) COPIES OF THE FORM DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE:
(1) KEPT ON BOARD EACH AIRCRAFT; AND

SENATE BILL 505
(2) IN THE EVENT OF AN EMERGENCY, PROVIDED TO EMERGENCY
RESPONDERS OR HOSPITALS IN THE STATE.
(E) THE FLIGHT CREW ON EACH AIRCRAFT SHALL DISTRIBUTE AND
COLLECT THE FORMS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION FROM EACH
DETAINED PASSENGER ON BOARD THE AIRCRAFT.
(F) BEFORE PROVIDING SERVICE TO AN AIRCRAFT, EACH FBO OR
AVIATION SERVICE COMPANY SHALL INSPECT THE AIRCRAFT TO CONFIRM THAT THE
FORMS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION ARE ON BOARD THE
AIRCRAFT.
(G) (1) EACH FBO OR AVIATION SERVICE COMPANY SHALL:
(I) COMPILE A REPORT THAT DOCUMENTS, FOR EACH
AIRCRAFT TRAVELING WITH A DETAINED INDIVIDUAL:
1. THE AGENCY OR COMPANY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
AIRCRAFT;
2. THE PRESENCE OF THE FORMS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
3. COMPLIANCE WITH § 5–1010 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(II) SUBMIT MONTHLY TO THE ADMINISTRATION THE REPORTS
DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) A MEMBER OF EACH FLIGHT CREW AND FBO OR AVIATION
SERVICE COMPANY SHALL SIGN EACH REPORT DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
5–108.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AVIATION SERVICE COMPANY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
5–107 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “DETAINED INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–107
OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 505 5
(4) “FIXED BASE OPERATOR” OR “FBO” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 5–107 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(5) “PERSON” INCLUDES:
(I) THE STATE;
(II) A COUNTY, A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR ANY OTHER
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; AND
(III) A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT OR A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT ENTER INTO A CONTRACT, GRANT, OR OTHER
AGREEMENT WITH AN AIRLINE THAT TRANSPORTS DETAINED INDIVIDUALS UNLESS
THE AIRLINE PROVIDES EVIDENCE OF:
(1) A VALID WARRANT ISSUED BY A FEDERAL COURT OR COURT OF
THE STATE;
(2) A VALID COURT ORDER; OR
(3) THE GOVERNOR’S AUTHORIZATION OF THE EXTRADITION OF THE
DETAINED INDIVIDUAL TO ANOTHER STATE.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT ENTER INTO A CONTRACT, GRANT, OR
OTHER AGREEMENT WITH AN FBO OR AN AVIATION SERVICE COMPANY THAT
SERVICES AIRLINES THAT TRANSPORT DETAINED INDIVIDUALS THROUGH
BALTIMORE–WASHINGTON INTERNATIONAL THURGOOD MARSHALL AIRPORT
UNLESS THE AIRLINE PROVIDES EVIDENCE OF:
(1) A VALID WARRANT ISSUED BY A FEDERAL COURT OR COURT OF
THE STATE;
(2) A VALID COURT ORDER; OR
(3) THE GOVERNOR’S AUTHORIZATION OF THE EXTRADITION OF THE
DETAINED INDIVIDUAL TO ANOTHER STATE.
5–1010.

SENATE BILL 505
(A) AN AIRCRAFT MAY NOT BE REFUELED IF AN INDIVIDUAL ON BOARD THE
AIRCRAFT IS IN ANY KIND OF RESTRAINT.
(B) IF A RESTRAINED INDIVIDUAL IS REMOVED FROM AN AIRCRAFT FOR
THE AIRCRAFT TO REFUEL, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL:
(1) BE PLACED IN A CLIMATE CONTROLLED ENCLOSURE; AND
(2) HAVE ACCESS TO RESTROOMS AND WATER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.